Utah statutes.
59-7-308.   Allocation of capital gains and losses.
To the extent that the following constitute nonbusiness income:
(1)  capital gains and losses from sales of real property located in this
state are allocable to this state;
(2)  capital gains and losses from sales of tangible personal property are
allocable to this state if:
(a)  the property had a situs in this state at the time of the sale; or
(b)  the taxpayer's commercial domicile is in this state and the taxpayer is
not taxable in the state in which the property had a situs; and
(3)  capital gains and losses from sales of intangible personal property are
allocable to this state if the taxpayer's commercial domicile is in this
state.
